Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
Subchapter 9
— Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 10, provided: “If any provision of this act is found to conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 219, § 9, provided: “Provided, nothing in this act shall be construed to amend, abrogate, modify, or repeal any of the provisions of the ‘Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act’, Arkansas Code § 8-7-901 et seq., and the fees levied by that act on each gallon of motor fuel or distillate special fuels shall continue to be collected as provided by those Code sections in addition to all taxes and fees imposed by other sections of the Code on such fuel or fuels as well as those additional taxes and fees imposed by this act.”

Acts 1991, No. 219 is codified as §§ 26-56-201, 26-56-222, 27-14-601, and 27-35-210. Acts 1991, No. 219 also repealed §§ 27-35-204, 27-35-205, and 27-35-212.

Identical Acts 1991, Nos. 364 and 382, § 6, provided: “Provided, nothing in this act shall be construed to amend, abrogate, modify, or repeal any of the provisions of the ‘Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act,’ Arkansas Code § 8-7-901 et seq., and all fees on each gallon of motor fuel or distillate special fuels shall continue to be collected as provided by those code sections in addition to all taxes and fees imposed by other sections of the code on such fuel or fuels as well as those additional taxes and fees imposed by this act.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 13: Feb. 22, 1989, except § 4: effective July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is in the best interest of the people of the State of Arkansas that a fund be established for corrective action and compensation to third parties to maintain the environment and protect the public health, welfare and safety; that for immediate funds to begin accumulating in this fund, under section 4 of this act, it is necessary for section 4 to become effective July 1, 1989 and all other provisions to become effective immediately upon passage. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval with section 4 of this act to become effective July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 16: Nov. 16, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that underground storage tank insurance is not readily available to cover the deductibles or upper-level third party damage claims; therefore, the relevant provisions must be changed, and this Act should be given effect immediately in order to relieve the burden as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1054, § 7: Apr. 10, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need to provide an additional method for financing the remediation costs and costs of compensating tank owners or operators for third-party claims from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1018, § 8: Apr. 2, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas Code 25-16-903 authorized members of the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks and members of the State Marketing Board of Recyclables to receive a stipend for attending board meetings; that Arkansas Code 8-7-904 and 8-9-201 were enacted prior to Arkansas Code 25-16-903 and do not mention stipends; that the earlier code sections should be amended to parallel the authority granted in § 25-16-903; that this act makes those technical corrections; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to avoid confusion. It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law concerning expense reimbursement for the State Board of Collection Agencies does not conform to Arkansas Code 25-16-901 et seq.; the State Board of Collection Agencies should be allowed to receive a stipend; and that this act is immediately necessary for the effective operation of the State Board of Collection Agencies. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1027, § 8: Apr. 2, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the expansion of the fund to include undiscovered petroleum storage tanks for which fees have not been paid is necessary to ensure that owners or operators search for such tanks and perform necessary investigations or corrective action. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1471, § 6: Apr. 10, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 83rd General Assembly that under present law a requirement for Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund eligibility is substantial compliance with applicable federal and state requirements. This eligibility requirement poses two significant problems. First, a storage tank owner or operator found ineligible for the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund reimbursement is in reality penalized tens of thousands of dollars that are typically expended on investigation and/or remediation of petroleum releases. Second, the difficulty specifying the type of conduct that constitutes substantial compliance generates uncertainty as to whether the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund will be available to owners or operators of such equipment. Consequently, it has been determined that instead of judging trust fund eligibility on the basis of substantial compliance, requiring owners and operators of storage tanks to annually complete and submit to the department self-inspection audits will better enhance environmental protection. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1114, § 7: Apr. 7, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under present law a requirement for Petroleum Storage Tank Fund eligibility for reimbursement for third party claims for bodily injury and property damage is the payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) to injured third parties by the owner or operator; that if the owner or operator is discharged in bankruptcy or declared insolvent, injured third parties may have no protection under the law; that existing law should be changed immediately so that injured third parties will be guaranteed access to the fund that is specifically designed to compensate them for their injuries; and that, in addition, owners or operators may not enjoy the protection originally intended by the General Assembly when it initially enacted this statute unless the definition of compensatory damages is clarified. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-901. Title.

This subchapter may be known and may be cited as the “Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 1.

8-7-902. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Aboveground storage tank” means any one (1) or a combination of containers, vessels, and enclosures located aboveground, including structures and appurtenances connected to them, the capacity of which is greater than one thousand three hundred twenty gallons (1,320 gals.) and not more than forty thousand gallons (40,000 gals.) and that is used to contain or dispense motor fuels, distillate special fuels, or other refined petroleum products.

“Aboveground storage tank” does not include mobile storage tanks used to transport petroleum from one (1) location to another or those used in the production of petroleum or natural gas;

“Accidental release” means any sudden or nonsudden confirmed release of petroleum from a storage tank that results in a need for corrective action or a claim for compensatory damages, or both, neither expected nor intended by the storage tank owner or operator;

“Advisory committee” or “committee” means the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks as established in this subchapter;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

“Compensatory damages” means all damages for which an owner or operator may be liable, including, without limitation, bodily injury or property damage.

“Compensatory damages” does not include:

Punitive damages; or

The costs of litigation, which shall not be limited to attorney’s or expert witness fees.

This definition shall apply to any pending third-party claim which has not been reduced to judgment as of April 7, 2003;

“Corrective action” means those actions which may be necessary to protect human health and the environment as a result of an accidental release, sudden or nonsudden;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Distributor” means and includes any person, including the State of Arkansas and any political subdivision thereof, but not including the United States or any of its instrumentalities, except to the extent permitted by the United States Constitution or laws thereof, who is customarily in the wholesale business of offering motor fuels for resale or delivery to dealers, consumers, or others in storage tanks of two hundred gallons (200 gals.) or more which are not connected to motor vehicles and is:

Making the first sale in the State of Arkansas of any motor fuel imported into the state from any other state, territory, or foreign country after it has been received within this state within the meaning of the Motor Fuel Tax Law, § 26-55-201 et seq.;

Consuming or using in the State of Arkansas any motor fuel so imported and who has purchased it before it has been received by any other person in this state, within the meaning of the Motor Fuel Tax Law, § 26-55-201 et seq.; or

Producing, refining, preparing, distilling, manufacturing, blending, or compounding motor fuel in this state;

“Fund” means the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund created by this subchapter;

“Occurrence” means an accident, including continuous or repeated exposure to conditions, which results in a release from a storage tank;

“Owner or operator”, when the owner and operator are separate parties, means the person who is required to obtain financial assurances under the state underground storage tank program or federal underground storage tank program;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company or trust, or venture, or municipal, state, or federal government or agency, or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Petroleum” means petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, which is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure of sixty degrees Fahrenheit (60° F) and fourteen and seven-tenths pounds per square inch (14.7 psi) absolute;

“Release” means any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping, leaching, or disposing from a storage tank into groundwater, surface water, or subsurface soils.

“Release” does not include a release that is permitted or authorized by the Division of Environmental Quality or by federal law;

“Storage tank” means an aboveground storage tank or underground storage tank as defined in this subchapter;

“Supplier” means any person who is customarily in the wholesale business of offering distillate special fuels or liquefied gas special fuels for resale or use to any person in this state and who makes bulk sales of fuel.

“Supplier” includes pipeline importers, first receivers, and second receivers;

“Terminal” means a bulk storage facility for storing petroleum products supplied by pipeline or marine vessels;

“Underground storage tank” means any one (1) or a combination of tanks, including underground pipes connected thereto, that is or has been used to contain petroleum, and the volume of which, including the volume of the underground pipes connected thereto, is ten percent (10%) or more beneath the surface of the ground.

“Underground storage tank” does not include any:

Farm or residential tank of one thousand one hundred gallons (1,100 gals.) or less capacity used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes;

Tank used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premises where stored;

Septic tank;

Intrastate and interstate pipeline facilities regulated by the Arkansas Public Service Commission or other applicable state or federal agency and all other pipeline facilities, including gathering lines regulated under:

The Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.; or

The Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979;

Surface impoundment, pit, pond, or lagoon;

Storm water or wastewater collection system;

Flow-through process tank;

Liquid trap or associated gather lines directly related to oil or gas production and gathering operations;

Storage tank situated in an underground area, such as a basement, cellar, mineworking, drift, shaft, or tunnel, if the storage tank is situated upon or above the surface of the floor; or

Any pipes connected to any tank which is described in this subdivision (19)(B); and

“Unknown petroleum storage tank” means a petroleum storage tank as defined by this subchapter whose existence on a property or facility at the time of the discovery of a release was not known or should not have reasonably been known by the owner or operator.

An owner or operator is deemed to have known of the existence of an unknown petroleum storage tank if there was surficial evidence of such a petroleum storage tank in the form of visible vent pipes, fill caps, or lines protruding from the petroleum storage tank.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 2; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, §§ 1, 2; 1991, No. 616, § 1; 1993, No. 951, § 1; 1997, No. 641, § 1; 1997, No. 1027, §§ 3, 4; 1999, No. 1164, § 107; 2001, No. 1471, § 3; 2003, No. 1114, § 1; 2009, No. 282, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2802, 2803.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted (17), which defined “storage tank self-inspection audit,”
redesignated the subsequent sudivisions accordingly, and substituted “(19)” for “(20)” in (19)(B)(x).

The 2019 amendment repealed (7) and (8); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in (15)(B).

U.S. Code.

The Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.

8-7-903. Rules — Powers of division.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to adopt appropriate rules not inconsistent with this subchapter as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of and to assure compliance with this subchapter.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission is authorized to adopt appropriate rules not inconsistent with this subchapter to carry out the intent and purposes of and to assure compliance with this subchapter.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have the authority to enter upon the property of any owner or operator of an aboveground storage tank to obtain information, conduct surveys, or review records for the purpose of determining substantial compliance, as defined by this subchapter and rules promulgated thereunder, with all state laws and rules and federal laws and regulations relating to aboveground storage tanks prior to the secretary's approval of a claim for reimbursement or disbursement.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 5; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 7; 1993, No. 951, § 2; 1997, No. 641, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 666; 2019, No. 910, §§
2804, 2805.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading, in (a), and (b); and, in (c), substituted “rules” for “regulations” and inserted “laws and rules”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c).

8-7-904. Advisory committee.

There is established the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks to be composed of the following members:

A representative from the property and casualty segment of the insurance industry;

A representative from a company that is a refiner and also has service stations or other motor fuel retail outlets in the state;

A representative from a company that is a jobber or wholesaler of petroleum products in the state;

An independent retail service station dealer;

The State Fire Marshal or his or her designee;

A representative from a company that installs or repairs petroleum storage tanks; and

A representative from a company that has one (1) or more employees with knowledge and expertise regarding environmental protection and management matters.

The Governor shall appoint the members of the committee subject to confirmation by the Senate as follows:

The Governor shall consult the Arkansas Petroleum Council before making the appointment under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section;

The Governor shall consult the Arkansas Oil Marketers Association before making the appointment under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section;

The Governor shall consult the Service Station Dealers of Arkansas before making the appointment under subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section; and

The Governor shall consult the Arkansas Environmental Federation, Inc., before making the appointment under subdivision (a)(1)(G) of this section.

Each member of the committee shall serve a four-year term and until a successor has been appointed.

Any vacancies shall be filled by the Governor to serve the remainder of the term.

Committee members shall serve without compensation but may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The committee shall select a member to serve as chair each year.

The committee shall meet as necessary to carry out its duties under this subchapter and at the call of the chair.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall provide adequate staff to support the activities of the committee.

The committee shall adopt all rules necessary to conduct its business.

The committee shall advise and make recommendations to the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality regarding claims for payment under this subchapter.

The committee shall advise the division and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission regarding promulgation of rules concerning storage tanks.

No member of the committee shall participate in any decision on any claim in which the firm or organization by which that member is employed or in which that member has a direct or indirect financial interest is involved.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 6; 1993, No. 951, § 3; 1997, No. 250, § 49; 1997, No. 1018, § 1; 1997, No. 1354, § 9; 1999, No. 1508, §§ 2, 7; 2015, No. 1100, § 8; 2019, No. 315, §§ 667, 668; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2806-2808.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added “subject to confirmation by the Senate as follows” in the introductory language of (a)(2); and rewrote (a)(2)(A) through (D).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (f) and (h).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (e) and (g); and substituted “division” for “department” in (h).

8-7-905. Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund”, hereinafter referred to as the “fund”.

The fund will be administered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, who shall make disbursements from the fund as authorized by this subchapter.

The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, donations, and such other funds as may be made available by the General Assembly, including all interest earned upon money deposited into the fund, fees assessed under this subchapter, any moneys recovered by the Division of Environmental Quality, the proceeds of bonds issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority for the benefit of the fund, and any other moneys legally designated for the fund.

Moneys in the fund may be expended by the director solely for the following purposes, as limited by the provisions of subsection (e) of this section:

The state share mandated by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.;

To pay costs incurred by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the director, the Attorney General, or the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks in the performance of their duties under this subchapter;

To pay reimbursement to owners and operators for taking corrective action or to pay third parties for compensatory damages caused by accidental releases from qualified storage tanks;

To pay reasonable and necessary costs and expenses of the division for taking corrective action caused by accidental releases from a storage tank of unknown ownership or when corrective action is not commenced by the owner or operator in a timely manner;

To reimburse owners and operators in the vicinity of the release for performing short-term testing or monitoring which is in addition to that required by the division's rules if the division has a reasonable basis for believing that the petroleum underground storage tank or tanks may be the source of the release.

The owners and operators of petroleum underground storage tanks, including out-of-service and nonoperational petroleum underground storage tanks, not found to be the source of the release and who cooperate with the division may apply to the fund for reimbursement for such testing and monitoring costs, not including lost managerial time or loss of revenues because of temporary business closure; and

To reimburse a consultant under § 8-7-907(k) for the purchase of equipment needed to undertake corrective action.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subchapter, the director, upon finding that a release may present an imminent and substantial hazard to the health of persons or to the environment and that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health and welfare or the environment, may, without receiving prior advice from the committee, issue an order reciting the existence of such an imminent hazard and emergency and ordering a disbursement or reimbursement of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from the fund so that such action may be taken as he or she determines to be necessary to protect the health of such persons or the environment and to meet the emergency.

No expenditure from the fund shall be made for expenses for retrofitting or replacement of petroleum storage tanks.

No expenditure from the fund pursuant to subdivisions (d)(3) and (5) of this section shall be made for attorney's fees.

The liability or obligation of the fund is not the liability or obligation of the State of Arkansas. However, this subsection shall not be construed as relieving the fund of any liability or obligation prescribed in this subchapter upon the entry of a valid court order or valid final order of the Arkansas State Claims Commission establishing a judgment against any state agency, board, department, or commission or when a settlement agreement has been reached arising from third-party claims against any state agency, board, department, or commission when the state agency, board, department, or commission is determined to be the owner or operator.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to abrogate or waive the provisions of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20.

An owner or operator who considers himself or herself injured in his or her business, person, or property by a final decision of the director or the director's delegatee under this subchapter may appeal the decision to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission within thirty (30) days after the date of the final decision of the director or the director's delegatee.

The procedures of the division and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of rules, conduct of hearings, notice, power of subpoena, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in §§ 8-4-202, 8-4-210 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229, and in rules applicable to administrative procedures of the division and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission to the extent they are not in conflict with the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 3; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, §§ 3, 4; 1991, No. 615, § 1; 1993, No. 951, § 4; 1995, No. 1054, § 2; 1997, No. 641, § 3; 2001, No. 206, § 1; 2003, No. 1114, § 2; 2013, No. 406, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 669; 2019, No. 910, §§
2809-2811.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (d)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” twice in (i)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, § 19-5-959.

8-7-906. Petroleum environmental assurance fee.

There is established a petroleum environmental assurance fee to be paid, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, on each gallon of motor fuel or distillate special fuel purchased in or imported into this state.

The fee shall be paid by the first distributor or supplier receiving fuel from a terminal in this state, or, if the fuel will never be stored in a terminal in this state, then by the distributor or supplier who first imports fuel into this state by tank truck.

Exchanges of fuels on a gallon-for-gallon basis within a terminal or fuels exported from this state are exempt from the fee.

Proof of payment shall be provided to the owner or operator.

The fee shall be remitted to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration at the time, in the manner, and on forms prescribed by the secretary and may be collected and remitted at the same time and in the same manner as the motor fuels tax and special motor fuels tax under § 26-55-101 et seq. and the Special Motor Fuels Tax Law, § 26-56-101 et seq.

For so long as no bonds for the benefit of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund are issued and outstanding, the fees collected under this subchapter shall be deposited into the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund.

The applicable fund balances shall be required to be maintained in perpetuity.

The maximum rate for the fee shall be at a rate of three-tenths of one cent (0.3¢) for each gallon of fuel.

For so long as no bonds for the benefit of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund are outstanding, the fee shall be collected at the maximum rate. However, when the balance of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, as adjusted to reflect the obligations and liabilities of the fund, reaches fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), the rate shall drop at the beginning of the next calendar quarter to such rate as the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission determines is necessary to maintain a fifteen million dollar ($15,000,000) adjusted balance.

The rate shall be increased at the beginning of the next calendar quarter when the fund balance, as adjusted to reflect the obligations and liabilities of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, drops to twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) or less and remains at the higher amount, not to exceed three-tenths of one cent (0.3¢), until the adjusted fund balance reaches fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

The commission shall review the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund balance, as adjusted to reflect the obligations and liabilities of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, at least quarterly and report the rate of collection for the fee for the upcoming quarter to the secretary.

During any period when bonds for the benefit of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund are outstanding, the fee shall be collected at a rate of three-tenths of one cent (0.3¢) for each gallon irrespective of the balance of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund.

During any period when bonds are outstanding for the benefit of the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, the fee shall be deposited into the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Revenue Bond Debt Service Fund as provided in the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Bond Financing Act, § 15-5-1201 et seq.

All other fees or moneys collected under this subchapter shall continue to be deposited into the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund.

All fees shall be subject to collection and enforcement of collection under the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 173, § 4; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 65, §§ 5, 6; 1993, No. 951, § 5; 1995, No. 1054, § 3; 1997, No. 641, § 4; 2005, No. 670, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3369, 3370.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (e); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (e) and (g)(3).